Georgia, session 2025_26, HB321.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Vincent Fort Living Wage Act."
SECTION 2.
Code Section 34-4-3 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to amount of
minimum wage to be paid by employers, is amended by revising subsection (a) as follows:
"(a) Except as otherwise provided in this Code section, every employer, whether a person,
firm, or corporation, shall pay to all covered employees a minimum wage which shall be
not less than $5.15 $15.00 per hour for each hour worked in the employment of such
employer."
H. B. 321
- 1 -

LC 52 0691
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 321
- 2 -